Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-204 Classes of insurance authorized.
An insurer which otherwise qualifies therefor may be authorized to transact any
one or more classes of insurance as defined in sections 431:1-204 to 431:1-211;
provided that:

(1) A life insurer shall not transact any insurance
in addition to life insurance except accident and health or sickness insurance;
provided that nothing herein shall limit a life insurer existing and authorized
on July 1, 1988, from writing any authorized insurance stated in its charter;
and

(2) A reciprocal insurer shall not transact life or
accident and health or sickness insurance. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2003,
c 212, §19]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next